District of Columbia statutes.
36-155

Proceeding in Superior Court to ascertain violations; search warrant.

Upon complaint of any person who has complied with § 36-152, or of his agent, to the Superior Court of the District of Columbia, or 1 of the judges thereof, that any person within the District of Columbia is guilty of the violation of any provision of this subchapter, the said Court or judge may issue a search warrant to discover and obtain such vessels as aforesaid and their contents, and may also cause to be brought before the said Court or judge the person so believed to be guilty, or his agent or employee, in whose possession or upon whose wagon or premises any such vessel or vessels may be found; and any such person, agent, or employee found guilty of a violation of any of the provisions of this subchapter shall be punished as aforesaid, and the said Court or judge shall also order the property taken upon any such search warrant to be delivered to its owner.

History

Mar. 3, 1901, ch. 854, § 878e
Feb. 27, 1907, 34 Stat. 1007, ch. 2086
Apr. 1, 1942, 56 Stat. 190, ch. 207, § 1
July 8, 1963, 77 Stat. 77, Pub. L. 88-60, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 570, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 155(a)

Cross References

Search warrants, see § 23-521 et seq.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 48-305.
1973 Ed., § 48-305.